District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-525

Requirements for amendment and for cancellation of certificate.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 661, Pub. L. 87-716, § 25
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 589, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 168(h)
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856

History

1981 Ed., § 41-225.
1973 Ed., § 41-425.

Prior Codifications